Wisconsin, session 2025, SB803.
do enact as follows:SB803,13Section 1. 106.27 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 106.27 (1) (b) 1. 4(intro.) and amended to read:SB803,2,21106.27 (1) (b) 1. (intro.) Grants for programs that train teachers and that 2train individuals to become teachers, including teachers in dual all of the following:SB803,2,33a. Dual enrollment programs.SB803,24Section 2. 106.27 (1) (b) 1. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB803,2,85106.27 (1) (b) 1. b. Programs that provide evidence-based educational 6training, leadership development, on-site job experience, and other support to 7provide individuals with skills and experience needed to pursue careers as 8teachers.SB803,2,99